Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2691.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.510.250 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 1004 are each amended to read as follows:(((1))) On or before the last business day of September 1969 and each month thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction shall apportion from the state general fund to the several educational service districts of the state the proportional share of the total annual amount due and apportionable to such educational service districts for the school districts thereof as follows:September. . . .((9%))9.0%October. . . .((8%))8.0%November. . . .((5%))5.0%December. . . .((9%))9.0%January. . . .((8.5%))9.0%February. . . .((9%))9.0%March. . . .((9%))10.0%April. . . .((9%))9.0%May. . . .((5%))6.0%June. . . .6.0%Â July. . . .((12.5%))10.0%August. . . .10.0%Â The annual amount due and apportionable shall be the amount apportionable for all apportionment credits estimated to accrue to the schools during the apportionment year beginning September 1st and continuing through August 31st. Appropriations made for school districts for each year of a biennium shall be apportioned according to the schedule set forth in this section for the fiscal year starting September 1st of the then calendar year and ending August 31st of the next calendar year((, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section)). The apportionment from the state general fund for each month shall be an amount which will equal the amount due and apportionable to the several educational service districts during such month: PROVIDED, That any school district may petition the superintendent of public instruction for an emergency advance of funds which may become apportionable to it but not to exceed ten percent of the total amount to become due and apportionable during the school districts apportionment year. The superintendent of public instruction shall determine if the emergency warrants such advance and if the funds are available therefor. If the superintendent determines in the affirmative, he or she may approve such advance and, at the same time, add such an amount to the apportionment for the educational service district in which the school district is located: PROVIDED, That the emergency advance of funds and the interest earned by school districts on the investment of temporary cash surpluses resulting from obtaining such advance of state funds shall be deducted by the superintendent of public instruction from the remaining amount apportionable to said districts during that apportionment year in which the funds are advanced.(((2) In the 2010-11 school year, the June apportionment payment to school districts shall be reduced by one hundred twenty-eight million dollars, and an additional apportionment payment shall be made on July 1, 2011, in the amount of one hundred twenty-eight million dollars. This July 1st payment shall be in addition to the regularly calculated July apportionment payment.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect September 1, 2026.--- END ---